Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1979.
hereby enacts as follows:PART IGENERAL PROVISIONSSection 101. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the General Appropriation Act of 2025.Section 102. State appropriations.The following sums specified in this act, or as much thereof as may be necessary, are specifically appropriated from the General Fund to certain agencies of the Executive Department of the Commonwealth for the payment of salaries, wages or other compensation and travel expenses of the duly elected or appointed officers and employees of the Commonwealth, for the payment of fees for contractual services rendered, for the 1234567891011121314151617181920 purchase or rental of goods and services, printing, public advertising by or through any medium, equipment, land and buildings and for payment of any other expenses, as provided by law or by this act, necessary for the proper conduct of the duties, functions and activities and for the purposes specified for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and for the payment of bills incurred and remaining unpaid at the close of the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025.PART IIGENERAL FUND APPROPRIATIONSSUBPART AEXECUTIVE DEPARTMENTSection 201. Department of Human Services.The following amounts are appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of Human Services for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025: Federal StateFor rape crisis programs.State appropriation....... 12,471,000PART LXXXIMISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONSSection 8101. Deduction of expenditures under temporary expenditure symbols.Any money that has been expended under temporary expenditure symbols approved by the Office of the Budget and paid after June 30, 2025, through the date of enactment of this act, shall be deducted from the corresponding appropriation of this act.Section 8102. Retroactivity.This act shall apply retroactively to July 1, 2025.20250HB1979PN2499 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 8103. Effective date.This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1979PN2499 - 3 - 12